Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 6. FOOD, DRUGS, ALCOHOL, AND HAZARDOUS SUBSTANCES

SUBTITLE B. ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAMS

CHAPTER 465. LOCAL DRUG AND ALCOHOL EDUCATION PROGRAMS

Sec. 465.001. COMMISSION. A municipality or county may create and support with public funds a commission to:

(1) educate the public on drug and alcohol abuse;

(2) promote drug and alcohol education at all levels of the schools;

(3) study the effectiveness of efforts, including the commission's efforts, in reducing drug and alcohol abuse; and

(4) create and administer a program to counsel or treat drug and alcohol abusers or to provide both counseling and treatment.

Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 14, Sec. 191.

Sec. 465.002. INDIVIDUAL OR JOINT ACTION. The municipality or county may create the commission by its own action or jointly by agreement with another municipality or county or a private foundation, nonprofit organization, church, or other entity. If the commission is created by agreement, all matters regarding the creation and operation of the commission are governed as provided by the agreement.

Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 14, Sec. 191.

Sec. 465.003. REPORT. The commission shall report annually to each entity that participates in the creation of the commission regarding the commission's activities.

Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 14, Sec. 191.